Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.070

Town officers enumerated.

The government of a town shall be vested in a mayor and a council consisting of five members and a treasurer, all elective; the mayor shall appoint a clerk and a marshal; and may appoint a town attorney, pound master, street superintendent, a civil engineer, and such police and other subordinate officers and employees as may be provided for by ordinance. All appointive officers and employees shall hold office at the pleasure of the mayor, subject to any applicable law, rule, or regulation relating to civil service, and shall not be subject to confirmation by the town council.

[ 1997 c 361 s 3; 1993 c 47 s 2; 1987 c 3 s 12; 1965 ex.s. c 116 s 14; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.070. Prior: 1961 c 89 s 3; prior: (i) 1903 c 113 s 4; 1890 p 198 s 143; RRS s 9164. (ii) 1941 c 108 s 2; 1939 c 87 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9165-1a. (iii) 1943 c 183 s 1, part; 1941 c 91 s 1, part; 1911 c 33 s 1, part; 1903 c 113 s 5, part; 1890 p 198 s 144, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9165.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 3: See note following RCW 3.70.010.